District of Columbia statutes.
6-623.04

Office of Zoning — Recommendations, reports, review and comment by Office of Planning.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prevent the Office of Planning from continuing to provide recommendations and reports to the Zoning Commission and the Board of Zoning Adjustment on any zoning case. The Office of Planning shall review and comment upon all zoning cases, and the Zoning Commission and the Board of Zoning Adjustment shall give great weight to the recommendation of the Office of Planning. Upon request of the Zoning Commission or the Board of Zoning Adjustment, the Office of Planning shall provide recommendations, information, or technical assistance in a timely manner.

Sept. 20, 1990, D.C. Law 8-163, § 5, 37 DCR 4676
Section effective October 1, 1991: Section 7(b) of D.C. Law 8-163 provided that the provisions of the act shall not apply until October 1, 1991.
1981 Ed., § 5-412.4.